Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3692.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [325F.013] ASPHALT. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For the purposes of this section, "person" means an individual, sole proprietor, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, corporation, partnership, incorporated or unincorporated association, joint stock company, or any other legal or commercial entity. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Illegal purchase; criminal penalty. new text end new text begin A person who is not registered as a construction contractor under section 326B.701 is guilty of a gross misdemeanor if the person: new text end new text begin (1) purchases hot mix or warm mix asphalt for commercial or retail paving use; new text end new text begin (2) falsely represents to a seller of hot mix or warm mix asphalt that the person has a valid construction contractor registration under section 326B.701; or new text end new text begin (3) falsely attests to a seller of hot mix or warm mix asphalt that the person is purchasing hot mix or warm mix asphalt solely for personal use. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Illegal sale; civil penalty. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of labor and industry may assess a civil penalty on a person who sells hot mix or warm mix asphalt to a person who does not possess a valid construction contractor registration under section 326B.701, unless: new text end new text begin (1) the purchaser attests that the asphalt is solely for personal use; and new text end new text begin (2) the purchaser purchases from the seller no more than: new text end new text begin (i) five tons of asphalt in a single transaction; and new text end new text begin (ii) ten tons of asphalt in any 12-month period. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner may impose a fine under this subdivision of: new text end new text begin (1) up to $1,000 per violation; or new text end new text begin (2) up to $3,000 per violation, if the commissioner (i) determines the seller knowingly or intentionally violated this subdivision, or (ii) previously imposed a civil penalty on the seller for a violation of this subdivision. new text end new text begin (c) A fine imposed under this subdivision may be recovered in a civil action in the name of the department brought in the district court of the county where the violation is alleged to have occurred or the district court where the commissioner has an office. The commissioner must deposit recovered civil penalties in the general fund. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Protection from civil liability. new text end new text begin A seller that cites subdivision 3 as the justification for refusing to sell hot mix or warm mix asphalt is not liable under civil law for refusing the sale. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for violations and crimes committed on or after August 1, 2027. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 326B.701, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Definitions. The following definitions apply to this section: (a) "Building construction or improvement services" means public or private sector commercial or residential building construction or improvement servicesnew text begin or a commercial or retail paving with hot mix or warm mix asphaltnew text end . (b) "Business entity" means a person as that term is defined in paragraph (h), except the term does not include an individual. (c) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of labor and industry or a duly designated representative of the commissioner who is either an employee of the Department of Labor and Industry or person working under contract with the Department of Labor and Industry. (d) "Day" means calendar day unless otherwise provided. (e) "Department" means the Department of Labor and Industry. (f) "Document" or "documents" includes papers; books; records; memoranda; data; contracts; drawings; graphs; charts; photographs; digital, video, and audio recordings; records; accounts; files; statements; letters; emails; invoices; bills; notes; and calendars maintained in any form or manner. (g) "Individual" means a human being. (h) "Person" means any individual, sole proprietor, limited liability company, limited liability partnership, corporation, partnership, incorporated or unincorporated association, joint stock company, or any other legal or commercial entity.